Hawaii statutes.
[§271G-15] Suspension, change, and
revocation of certificates. Certificates shall be effective from the date
specified therein, and shall remain in effect until suspended or terminated as
herein provided. Any certificate may, upon application of the holder thereof,
in the discretion of the public utilities commission, be amended or revoked, in
whole or in part, or may upon complaint, or on the commission's own initiative,
after notice and hearing, be suspended, changed, or revoked, in whole or in
part, for wilful failure to comply with any provisions of this chapter, or with
any lawful order, rule, or regulation of the commission promulgated thereunder,
or with any term, condition, or limitation of the certificate; provided that no
such certificate shall be revoked (except upon application of the holder)
unless the holder thereof wilfully fails to comply within a reasonable time,
not less than thirty days, to be fixed by the commission, with a lawful order
of the commission, made as provided in this chapter, commanding obedience to
this chapter, or to the rule or regulation of the commission thereunder, or to
the term, condition, or limitation of the certificate or permit, found by the
commission to have been violated by the holder; and provided further that the
right to engage in transportation by virtue of any certificate or any
application filed pursuant to section 271G-10 or by virtue of temporary
authority under section 271G-12 may be suspended by the commission, upon
reasonable notice of not less than fifteen days to the carrier, but without
hearing or other proceedings, for failure to comply, and until compliance, with
section 271G-17(a) or with any lawful order, rule, or regulation of the
commission promulgated thereunder. [L 1974, c 94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next